crates/zspell/tests/files/short.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
NOSUGGEST !

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y
SFX N   0     en         [^ey]

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   e     ions       e
SFX X   y     ications   y
SFX X   0     ens        [^ey]

REP 90
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
